Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.840

Notification to licensing agency of employment termination for certain crimes against persons.

When a business or an organization terminates, fires, dismisses, fails to renew the contract, or permits the resignation of an employee because of crimes against children or other persons or because of crimes relating to the financial exploitation of a vulnerable adult, and if that employee is employed in a position requiring a certificate or license issued by a licensing agency such as the Washington professional educator standards board, the business or organization shall notify the licensing agency of such termination of employment.

[ 2006 c 263 s 827; 2005 c 421 s 6; 1997 c 386 s 40. Prior: 1989 c 334 s 5; 1989 c 90 s 5; 1987 c 486 s 6.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.